Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
486M

PAWNBROKERS
AND SECONDHAND DEALERS

Section

486M-1 Definitions

486M-2 Record of transactions

486M-3 Transactions by minors prohibited

486M-4 Minimum retention of items

486M-5 Inspections

486M-6 Applicability

486M-7 Penalties

486M-8 Severability

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1991, c 120, pt of §1.

Cross References

Gold and silver stamping, see chapter 482D.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next